California statutes. Penal Code
 application for the writ must also be served on the city attorney of the city whose ordinance is the basis for the charge at least 24 hours before the time at which the writ is made returnable, provided that failure to serve the city attorney shall not deprive the court of jurisdiction to hear the application. If a writ challenging a denial of parole or the applicant’s suitability for parole is then made returnable, a copy of the application for the writ and the related order to show cause shall in all cases be served by the superior court upon the office of the Attorney General and the district attorney of the county in which the underlying judgment was rendered at least three business days before the time at which the writ is made returnable and no application for the writ can be heard without proof of such service.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 274, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

1476.

Any court or judge authorized to grant the writ, to whom a petition therefor is presented, must endorse upon the petition the hour and date of its presentation and the hour and date of the granting or denial of the writ, and must, if it appear that the writ ought to issue, grant the same without delay; and if the person by or upon whose behalf the application for the writ is made be detained upon a criminal charge, may admit him to bail, if the offense is bailable, pending the determination of the proceeding.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1949, Ch. 1021.)
-------------------------------------------

1477.

The writ must be directed to the person having custody of or restraining the person on whose behalf the application is made, and must command him to have the body of such person before the Court or Judge before whom the writ is returnable, at a time and place therein specified.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1478.

If the writ is directed to the sheriff or other ministerial officer of the court out of which it issues, it must be delivered by the clerk to such officer without delay, as other writs are delivered for service. If it is directed to any other person, it must be delivered to the sheriff or a marshal, and be by him served upon such person by delivering the copy to him without delay, and make his return on the original to the court of issuance. If the person to whom the writ is directed cannot be found, or refuses admittance to the officer or person serving or delivering such writ, it may be served or delivered by leaving it at the residence of the person to whom it is
 directed, or by affixing it to some conspicuous place on the outside either of his dwelling house or of the place where the party is confined or under restraint.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 479.)
-------------------------------------------

1479.

If the person to whom the writ is directed refuses, after service, to obey the same, the Court or Judge, upon affidavit, must issue an attachment against such person, directed to the Sheriff or Coroner, commanding him forthwith to apprehend such person and bring him immediately before such Court or Judge; and upon being so brought, he must be committed to the jail of the county until he makes due return to such writ, or is otherwise legally discharged.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1480.

The person upon whom the writ is served must state in his return, plainly and unequivocally:

1. Whether he has or has not the party in his custody, or under his power or restraint;

2. If he has the party in his custody or power, or under his restraint, he must state the authority and cause of such imprisonment or restraint;

3. If the party is detained by virtue of any writ, warrant, or other written authority, a copy thereof must be annexed to the return, and the original produced and exhibited to the
 Court or Judge on the hearing of such return;

4. If the person upon whom the writ is served had the party in his power or custody, or under his restraint, at any time prior or subsequent to the date of the writ of habeas corpus, but has transferred such custody or restraint to another, the return must state particularly to whom, at what time and place, for what cause, and by what authority such transfer took place;

5. The return must be signed by the person making the same, and, except when such person is a sworn public officer, and makes such return in his official capacity, it must be verified by his oath.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1481.

The person to whom the writ is directed, if it is served, must bring the body of the party in his custody or under his restraint, according to the command of the writ, except in the cases specified in the next section.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1482.

When, from sickness or infirmity of the person directed to be produced, he cannot, without danger, be brought before the Court or Judge, the person in whose custody or power he is may state that fact in his return to the writ, verifying the same by affidavit. If the Court or Judge is satisfied of the truth of such return, and the return to the writ is otherwise sufficient, the Court or Judge may proceed to decide on such return, and to dispose of the matter as if such party had been produced on the writ, or the hearing thereof may be adjourned until such party can be produced.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1483.

The Court or Judge before whom the writ is returned must, immediately after the return, proceed to hear and examine the return, and such other matters as may be properly submitted to their hearing and consideration.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1484.

The party brought before the Court or Judge, on the return of the writ, may deny or controvert any of the material facts or matters set forth in the return, or except to the sufficiency thereof, or allege any fact to show either that his imprisonment or detention is unlawful, or that he is entitled to his discharge. The Court or Judge must thereupon proceed in a summary way to hear such proof as may be produced against such imprisonment or detention, or in favor of the same, and to dispose of such party as the justice of the case may require, and have full power and authority to require and compel the attendance of witnesses, by process of subpoena and attachment, and to do and perform all
 other acts and things necessary to a full and fair hearing and determination of the case.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1485.

If no legal cause is shown for such imprisonment or restraint, or for the continuation thereof, such Court or Judge must discharge such party from the custody or restraint under which he is held.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1485.5.

(a) If the district attorney or Attorney General stipulates to or does not contest the factual allegations underlying one or more of the grounds for granting a writ of habeas corpus or a motion to vacate a judgment, the facts underlying the basis for the court’s ruling or order shall be binding on the Attorney General, the factfinder, and the California Victim Compensation Board.

(b) The district attorney shall provide notice to the Attorney General no fewer than seven days before entering into a stipulation of facts that will be the basis for the granting of a writ of habeas corpus or a motion to vacate a judgment. A response from the Attorney General is not required to proceed with the
 stipulation.

(c) In a contested or uncontested proceeding, the express factual findings made by the court, including credibility determinations, during proceedings on a petition for habeas corpus, a motion to vacate judgment pursuant to Section 1473.6, or an application for a certificate of factual innocence, shall be binding on the Attorney General, the factfinder, and the California Victim Compensation Board.

(d) For the purposes of this section, “express factual findings” are findings established as the basis for the court’s rulings or orders.

(e) For purposes of this section, “court” is defined as a state or federal court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 702, Sec. 2.   (SB 78)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

1485.55.

(a) In a contested or uncontested proceeding, if the court has granted a writ of habeas corpus or when the court vacates a judgment pursuant to Section 1473.6 and if the court has found that the person is factually innocent, under any standard for factual innocence applicable in those proceedings, that finding shall be binding on the California Victim Compensation Board for a claim presented to the board, and upon application by the person, the board shall, without a hearing,
 approve payment to the claimant, pursuant to Section 4904, if sufficient funds are available, upon appropriation by the Legislature.

(b) In a contested or uncontested proceeding, if the court has granted a writ of habeas corpus or vacated a judgment pursuant to Section 1473.6 or paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 1473.7, the person may move for a finding of factual innocence by a preponderance of the evidence that the crime with which they were charged was either not committed at all or, if committed, was not committed by the petitioner.

(c) If the court makes a finding that the petitioner has proven their factual innocence by a preponderance of the evidence pursuant to subdivision (b),
 upon application by the person, the board shall, without a hearing,
 approve payment to the claimant, pursuant to Section 4904, if sufficient funds are available, upon appropriation by the Legislature.

(d) (1) In a contested or uncontested proceeding, if the court has granted a writ of habeas corpus pursuant to common law, the California Constitution, the United States Constitution, or paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, of subdivision (b) of Section 1473, or vacated a judgment pursuant to Section 1473.6 or paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 1473.7, and the charges were subsequently dismissed, or the person was acquitted of the charges on a retrial, the petitioner may move the court for a finding that they are entitled to approval of a claim for compensation pursuant to
 Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 4900) of Title 6 of Part 3. The court shall grant the motion
 unless the district attorney objects in writing within 15 days from when the person files the motion and can establish by clear and convincing evidence that the person committed the acts constituting the offense and is therefore not entitled to compensation. The district attorney shall bear the burden of proving by clear and convincing evidence that the person committed the acts constituting the offense. The district attorney may request a single 30-day extension of time upon a showing of good cause. An extension of time beyond this period may be given if agreed upon by stipulation between both parties.

(2) If the district attorney does not object, or if the district attorney fails to establish by clear and convincing evidence that the person committed the acts constituting the offense as described in paragraph (1), the court
 shall grant the motion and the board shall, upon application by the person, without a hearing, approve payment to the claimant, pursuant to Section 4904, if sufficient funds are available, upon appropriation by the Legislature.

(3) If the motion is granted pursuant to a stipulation of the district attorney, and upon application by the person, the board shall, without a hearing, approve payment to the claimant, pursuant to Section 4904, if sufficient funds are available, upon appropriation by the
 Legislature.

(e) A conviction reversed and dismissed is no longer valid, thus the district attorney may not rely on the fact that the state still maintains that the claimant is guilty of the crime for which they were wrongfully convicted, that the state defended the conviction against the petitioner through court litigation, or that there was a conviction to establish that the petitioner is not entitled to compensation. The district attorney may also not rely solely on the trial record to establish that the petitioner is not entitled to compensation.

(f) A presumption does not exist in any other proceeding for failure to make a motion or obtain a favorable ruling pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b). No res judicata or collateral estoppel finding
 in any other proceeding shall be made for failure to make a motion or obtain a favorable ruling pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b) of this section.

(g) If a federal court, after granting a writ of habeas corpus, pursuant to a nonstatutory motion or request, finds a petitioner factually innocent by no less than a preponderance of the evidence that the crime with which they were charged was either not committed at all or, if committed, was not committed by the petitioner, upon application of the person, the board shall, without a hearing,
 approve payment to the claimant, pursuant to Section 4904, if sufficient funds are available, upon appropriation by the Legislature.

(h) For the purposes of this section, unless otherwise stated, “court” is defined as a state or federal court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 702, Sec. 3.   (SB 78)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

1486.

The Court or Judge, if the time during which such party may be legally detained in custody has not expired, must remand such party, if it appears that he is detained in custody:

1. By virtue of process issued by any Court or Judge of the United States, in a case where such Court or Judge has exclusive jurisdiction; or,

2. By virtue of the final judgment or decree of any competent Court of criminal jurisdiction, or of any process issued upon such judgment or decree.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1487.

If it appears on the return of the writ that the prisoner is in custody by virtue of process from any Court of this State, or Judge or officer thereof, such prisoner may be discharged in any of the following cases, subject to the restrictions of the last section:

1. When the jurisdiction of such Court or officer has been exceeded;

2. When the imprisonment was at first lawful, yet by some act, omission, or event which has taken place afterwards, the party has become entitled to a discharge;

3. When the
 process is defective in some matter of substance required by law, rendering such process void;

4. When the process, though proper in form, has been issued in a case not allowed by law;

5. When the person having the custody of the prisoner is not the person allowed by law to detain him;

6. Where the process is not authorized by any order, judgment, or decree of any Court, nor by any provision of law;

7. Where a party has been committed on a criminal charge without reasonable or probable cause.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1488.

If any person is committed to prison, or is in custody of any officer on any criminal charge, by virtue of any warrant of commitment of a magistrate, such person must not be discharged on the ground of any mere defect of form in the warrant of commitment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1608.)
-------------------------------------------

1489.

If it appears to the Court or Judge, by affidavit or otherwise, or upon the inspection of the process or warrant of commitment, and such other papers in the proceedings as may be shown to the Court or Judge, that the party is guilty of a criminal offense, or ought not to be discharged, such Court or Judge, although the charge is defective or unsubstantially set forth in such process or warrant of commitment, must cause the complainant or other necessary witnesses to be subpoenaed to attend at such time as ordered, to testify before the Court or Judge; and upon the examination he may discharge such prisoner, let him to bail, if the offense be bailable, or recommit him to custody, as may be
 just and legal.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1490.

When a person is imprisoned or detained in custody on any criminal charge, for want of bail, such person is entitled to a writ of habeas corpus for the purpose of giving bail, upon averring that fact in his petition, without alleging that he is illegally confined.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1491.

Any judge before whom a person who has been committed upon a criminal charge may be brought on a writ of habeas corpus, if the same is bailable, may take an undertaking of bail from such person as in other cases, and file the same in the proper court. Whenever a writ of habeas corpus is returned to a court for hearing and the petitioner is charged with an offense other than a crime of violence or committed with a deadly weapon or involving the forcible taking or destruction of the property of another, but the prisoner does not stand convicted of any offense, the amount of the bail must be set immediately if no bail has theretofore been fixed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1933, Ch. 595.)
-------------------------------------------

1492.

If a party brought before the Court or Judge on the return of the writ is not entitled to his discharge, and is not bailed, where such bail is allowable, the Court or Judge must remand him to custody or place him under the restraint from which he was taken, if the person under whose custody or restraint he was is legally entitled thereto.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1493.

In cases where any party is held under illegal restraint or custody, or any other person is entitled to the restraint or custody of such party, the Judge or Court may order such party to be committed to the restraint or custody of such person as is by law entitled thereto.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1494.

Until judgment is given on the return, the Court or Judge before whom any party may be brought on such writ may commit him to the custody of the Sheriff of the county, or place him in such care or under such custody as his age or circumstances may require.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1495.

No writ of habeas corpus can be disobeyed for defect of form, if it sufficiently appear therefrom in whose custody or under whose restraint the party imprisoned or restrained is, the officer or person detaining him, and the Court or Judge before whom he is to be brought.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1496.

No person who has been discharged by the order of the Court or Judge upon habeas corpus can be again imprisoned, restrained, or kept in custody for the same cause, except in the following cases:

1. If he has been discharged from custody on a criminal charge, and is afterwards committed for the same offense, by legal order or process;

2. If, after a discharge for defect of proof, or for any defect of the process, warrant, or commitment in a criminal case, the prisoner is again arrested on sufficient proof and committed by legal process for the same
 offense.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1497.

When it appears to any court, or judge, authorized by law to issue the writ of habeas corpus, that any one is illegally held in custody, confinement, or restraint, and that there is reason to believe that the person will be carried out of the jurisdiction of the court or judge before whom the application is made, or will suffer some irreparable injury before compliance with the writ of habeas corpus can be enforced, the court or judge may cause a warrant to be issued, reciting the facts, and directed to any peace officer, commanding the peace officer to take the person held in custody, confinement, or restraint, and immediately bring him or her before the
 court or judge, to be dealt with according to law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 990, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

1498.

The Court or Judge may also insert in such warrant a command for the apprehension of the person charged with such illegal detention and restraint.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1499.

The officer to whom such warrant is delivered must execute it by bringing the person therein named before the Court or Judge who directed the issuing of such warrant.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1500.

The person alleged to have such party under illegal confinement or restraint may make return to such warrant as in case of a writ of habeas corpus, and the same may be denied, and like allegations, proofs, and trial may thereupon be had as upon a return to a writ of habeas corpus.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1501.

If such party is held under illegal restraint or custody, he must be discharged; and if not, he must be restored to the care or custody of the person entitled thereto.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1502.

Any writ or process authorized by this Chapter may be issued and served on any day or at any time.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1503.

All writs, warrants, process, and subpoenas authorized by the provisions of this Chapter must be issued by the Clerk of the Court, and, except subpoenas, must be sealed with the seal of such Court, and served and returned forthwith, unless the Court or Judge shall specify a particular time for any such return.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1504.

All such writs and process, when made returnable before a Judge, must be returned before him at the county seat, and there heard and determined.

(History: Amended by Code Amendments 1880, Ch. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

1505.

If the officer or person to whom a writ of habeas corpus is directed, refuses obedience to the command thereof, he shall forfeit and pay to the person aggrieved a sum not exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000), to be recovered by action in any court of competent jurisdiction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1092, Sec. 322.5.   Effective September 27, 1983.   Operative January 1, 1984, by Sec. 427 of Ch. 1092.)
-------------------------------------------

1506.

An appeal may be taken to the court of appeal by the people from a final order of a superior court made upon the return of a writ of habeas corpus discharging a defendant or otherwise granting all or any part of the relief sought, in all criminal cases, excepting criminal cases where judgment of death has been rendered, and in such cases to the Supreme Court; and in all criminal cases where an application for a writ of habeas corpus has been heard and determined in a court of appeal, either the defendant or the people may apply for a hearing in the Supreme Court. Such appeal shall be taken and such application for hearing in the Supreme Court shall be made in accordance with
 rules to be laid down by the Judicial Council. If the people appeal from an order granting the discharge or release of the defendant, or petition for hearing in either the court of appeal or the Supreme Court, the defendant shall be admitted to bail or released on his own recognizance or any other conditions which the court deems just and reasonable, subject to the same limitations, terms, and conditions which are applicable to, or may be imposed upon, a defendant who is awaiting trial. If the order grants relief other than a discharge or release from custody, the trial court or the court in which the appeal or petition for hearing is pending may, upon application by the people, in its discretion, and upon such conditions as it deems just stay the execution of the order pending final determination of the matter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1080.)
-------------------------------------------

1507.

Where an application for a writ of habeas corpus has been made by or on behalf of any person other than a defendant in a criminal case, an appeal may be taken to the court of appeal from a final order of a superior court granting all or any part of the relief sought; and where such application has been heard and determined in a court of appeal, either on an application filed in that court or on appeal from a superior court, and all or any part of the relief sought has been granted, an application may be made for a hearing in the Supreme Court. Such appeal shall be taken and such application for hearing in the Supreme Court shall be made in accordance with rules to be laid
 down by the Judicial Council. The court which made the order granting relief or the court in which the appeal or petition for hearing is pending may, in its discretion, and upon such conditions as it deems just stay the execution of the order pending final determination of the matter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 17.)
-------------------------------------------

1508.

(a) A writ of habeas corpus issued by the Supreme Court or a judge thereof may be made returnable before the issuing judge or his court, before any court of appeal or judge thereof, or before any superior court or judge thereof.

(b) A writ of habeas corpus issued by a court of appeal or a judge thereof may be made returnable before the issuing judge or his court or before any superior court or judge thereof located in that appellate district.

(c) A writ of habeas corpus issued by a superior court or a judge thereof may be made
 returnable before the issuing judge or his court.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 38.)
-------------------------------------------

1509.

(a) This section applies to any petition for writ of habeas corpus filed by a person in custody pursuant to a judgment of death. A writ of habeas corpus pursuant to this section is the exclusive procedure for collateral attack on a judgment of death. A petition filed in any court other than the court which imposed the sentence should be promptly transferred to that court unless good cause is shown for the petition to be heard by another court. A petition filed in or transferred to the court which imposed the sentence shall be assigned to the original trial judge unless that judge is unavailable or there is other good cause to assign the case to a different judge.

(b) After the entry of a judgment of death in the trial court, that court shall offer counsel to the prisoner as provided in Section 68662 of the Government Code.

(c) Except as provided in subdivisions (d) and (g), the initial petition must be filed within one year of the order entered under Section 68662 of the Government Code.

(d) An initial petition which is untimely under subdivision (c) or a successive petition whenever filed shall be dismissed unless the court finds, by the preponderance of all available evidence, whether or not admissible at trial, that the defendant is actually innocent of the crime of which he or she was convicted or is ineligible for the sentence. A stay of execution shall not be granted for the purpose of considering a successive or untimely petition unless the court finds that the petitioner has a substantial claim of actual innocence or ineligibility. “Ineligible for the sentence of death” means that circumstances exist placing that sentence outside the range of the sentencer’s discretion. Claims of ineligibility include a claim that none of the special circumstances in subdivision (a) of Section
 190.2 is true, a claim that the defendant was under the age of 18 at the time of the crime, or a claim that the defendant has an intellectual disability, as defined in Section 1376. A claim relating to the sentencing decision under Section 190.3 is not a claim of actual innocence or ineligibility for the purpose of this section.

(e) A petitioner claiming innocence or ineligibility under subdivision (d) shall disclose all material information relating to guilt or eligibility in the possession of the petitioner or present or former counsel for petitioner. If the petitioner willfully fails to make the disclosure required by this subdivision and authorize disclosure by counsel, the petition may be dismissed.

(f) Proceedings under this section shall be conducted as expeditiously as possible, consistent with a fair adjudication. The superior court shall resolve the initial petition within one year of filing unless the court finds that a delay is necessary to
 resolve a substantial claim of actual innocence, but in no instance shall the court take longer than two years to resolve the petition. On decision of an initial petition, the court shall issue a statement of decision explaining the factual and legal basis for its decision.

(g) If a habeas corpus petition is pending on the effective date of this section, the court may transfer the petition to the court which imposed the sentence. In a case where a judgment of death was imposed prior to the effective date of this section, but no habeas corpus petition has been filed prior to the effective date of this section, a petition that would otherwise be barred by subdivision (c) may be filed within one year of the effective date of this section or within the time allowed under prior law, whichever is earlier.

(History: Added November 8, 2016, by initiative Proposition 66, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

1509.1.

(a) Either party may appeal the decision of a superior court on an initial petition under Section 1509 to the court of appeal. An appeal shall be taken by filing a notice of appeal in the superior court within 30 days of the court’s decision granting or denying the habeas petition. A successive petition shall not be used as a means of reviewing a denial of habeas relief.

(b) The issues considered on an appeal under subdivision (a) shall be limited to the claims raised in the superior court, except that the court of appeal may also consider a claim of ineffective assistance of trial counsel if the failure of habeas counsel to present that claim to the superior court constituted ineffective assistance. The court of appeal may, if additional findings of fact are required, make a limited remand to the superior court to consider the claim.

(c) The people may appeal the decision of the superior court granting relief on a successive petition. The petitioner may appeal the decision of the superior court denying relief on a successive petition only if the superior court or the court of appeal grants a certificate of appealability. A certificate of appealability may issue under this subdivision only if the petitioner has shown both a substantial claim for relief, which shall be indicated in the certificate, and a substantial claim that the requirements of subdivision (d) of Section 1509 have been met. An appeal under this subdivision shall be taken by filing a notice of appeal in the superior court within 30 days of the court’s decision. The superior court shall grant or deny a certificate of appealability concurrently with a decision denying relief on the petition. The court of appeal shall grant or deny a request for a certificate of appealability within 10 days of an application for a certificate. The jurisdiction of the
 court of appeal is limited to the claims identified in the certificate and any additional claims added by the court of appeal within 60 days of the notice of appeal. An appeal under this subdivision shall have priority over all other matters and be decided as expeditiously as possible.

(History: Added November 8, 2016, by initiative Proposition 66, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Pretrial Review [1510. - 1512.]

1510.

The denial of a motion made pursuant to Section 995 or 1538.5 may be reviewed prior to trial only if the motion was made by the defendant in the trial court not later than 45 days following defendant’s arraignment on the complaint if a misdemeanor, or 60 days following defendant’s arraignment on the information or indictment if a felony, unless within these time limits the defendant was unaware of the issue or had no opportunity to raise the issue.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 944.)
-------------------------------------------

1511.

If in a felony case the superior court sets the trial beyond the period of time specified in Section 1049.5, in violation of Section 1049.5, or continues the hearing of any matter without good cause, and good cause is required by law for such a continuance, either party may file a petition for writ of mandate or prohibition in the court of appeal seeking immediate appellate review of the ruling setting the trial or granting the continuance. Such a petition shall have precedence over all other cases in the court to which the petition is
 assigned, including, but not limited to, cases that originated in the juvenile court. If the court of appeal grants a peremptory writ, it shall issue the writ and a remittitur three court days after its decision becomes final as to that court if such action is necessary to prevent mootness or to prevent frustration of the relief granted, notwithstanding the right of the parties to file a petition for review in the Supreme Court. When the court of appeal issues the writ and remittitur as provided herein, the writ shall command the superior court to proceed with the criminal case without further delay, other than that reasonbly necessary for the parties to obtain the attendance of their witnesses.

The Supreme Court may stay or recall the issuance of the writ and remittitur. The Supreme Court’s failure to stay or recall the issuance of the writ and remittitur shall not deprive the respondent or the real party in interest of its right to file a petition for review in
 the Supreme Court.

(History: Added June 5, 1990, by initiative Proposition 115, Sec. 28.)
-------------------------------------------

1512.

(a) In addition to petitions for a writ of mandate, prohibition, or review which the people are authorized to file pursuant to any other statute or pursuant to any court decision, the people may also seek review of an order granting a defendant’s motion for severance or discovery by a petition for a writ of mandate or prohibition.

(b) In construing the legislative intent of subdivision (a), no inference shall be drawn from the amendment to Assembly Bill 1052 of the
 1989–90 Regular Session of the Legislature which deleted reference to the case of People v. Superior Court, 69 Cal. 2d 491.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 1511 (as added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 560) by Stats. 2001, Ch. 854, Sec. 46.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Of Search Warrants [1523. - 1542.5.]

1523.

A search warrant is an order in writing, in the name of the people, signed by a magistrate, directed to a peace officer, commanding him or her to search for a person or persons, a thing or things, or personal property, and, in the case of a thing or things or personal property, bring the same before the magistrate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1078, Sec. 1.5.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

1524.

(a) A search warrant may be issued upon any of the following grounds:

(1) When the property was stolen or embezzled.

(2) When the property or things were used as the means of committing a felony.

(3) When the property or things are in the possession of a person with the intent to use them as a means of committing a public offense, or in the possession of another to whom that person may have delivered them for the purpose of concealing them or preventing them from being discovered.

(4) When the property or things to be seized consist of an item or
 constitute evidence that tends to show a felony has been committed, or tends to show that a particular person has committed a felony.

(5) When the property or things to be seized consist of evidence that tends to show that sexual exploitation of a child, in violation of Section 311.3, or possession of matter depicting sexual conduct of a person under 18 years of age, in violation of Section 311.11, has occurred or is occurring.

(6) When there is a warrant to arrest a person.

(7) When a provider of electronic communication service or remote computing service has records or evidence, as specified in Section 1524.3, showing that property was stolen or embezzled constituting a misdemeanor, or that property or things are in the possession of a person with the intent to use them as a means of committing a misdemeanor
 public offense, or in the possession of another to whom that person may have delivered them for the purpose of concealing them or preventing their discovery.

(8) When the property or things to be seized include an item or evidence that tends to show a violation of Section 3700.5 of the Labor Code or tends to show that a particular person has violated Section 3700.5 of the Labor Code.

(9) When the property or things to be seized include a firearm or other deadly weapon at the scene of, or at the premises occupied or under the control of the person arrested in connection with, a domestic violence incident involving a threat to human life or a physical assault as provided in Section 18250. This section does not affect warrantless seizures otherwise authorized by Section 18250.

(10) When the property or things to be
 seized include a firearm or other deadly weapon that is owned by, or in the possession of, or in the custody or control of, a person described in subdivision (a) of Section 8102 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(11) When the property or things to be seized include a firearm that is owned by, or in the possession of, or in the custody or control of, a person who is subject to the prohibitions regarding firearms or ammunition or both pursuant to Section 6389 of the Family Code, if a prohibited firearm or ammunition or both is possessed, owned, in the custody of, or controlled by a person against whom a protective order has been issued pursuant to Section 6218 of the Family Code, the person has been lawfully served with that order, and the person has failed to relinquish the firearm or ammunition or both as required by law.

(12) When the information to be received from the use
 of a tracking device constitutes evidence that tends to show that either a felony, a misdemeanor violation of the Fish and Game Code, or a misdemeanor violation of the Public Resources Code has been committed or is being committed, tends to show that a particular person has committed a felony, a misdemeanor violation of the Fish and Game Code, or a misdemeanor violation of the Public Resources Code, or is committing a felony, a misdemeanor violation of the Fish and Game Code, or a misdemeanor violation of the Public Resources Code, or will assist in locating an individual who has committed or is committing a felony, a misdemeanor violation of the Fish and Game Code, or a misdemeanor violation of the Public Resources Code. A tracking device search warrant issued pursuant to this paragraph shall be executed in a manner meeting the requirements specified in subdivision (b) of Section 1534.

(13) When a sample of the blood of a person constitutes